Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.060

Subpoenas—Witness fees.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or production of books, documents, and records anywhere in the state in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license, certification, or permit issued under the provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1994 c 283 s 4; 1961 c 249 s 6.]